Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 74 Guaranteed Student Entitlement
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-74-1.
Legislative findings.

The current system of education financing does not provide for absolute equity, does not account completely for individual student needs, and relies too heavily on the property tax, and the governor through executive order 92-9 and the twenty-first century commission through its final report as endorsed by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education has cited the need for a guaranteed student entitlement program, it is enacted that the commissioner of elementary and secondary education present to the general assembly a new state aid education formula referred to as the “guaranteed student entitlement program”, based on the definition of equity in school funding in subsection (b).

“Equity” is defined as equal treatment of students and taxpayers. It means that a sufficient amount of money is allocated to enable all students to achieve learner outcomes, and tax burdens shall be based on ability to pay. It means that money spent for a child’s education shall not be a function of district wealth, and that all students shall have the same educational opportunities. The quality of education provided must be a function of statewide wealth.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 239, § 1.

16-74-2.
Objectives of program.

The guaranteed student entitlement program shall:

Limit the property tax rate levied in each community for education;

Provide for the costs necessary to educate students with special or additional needs;

Provide for an examination of expenditures to determine their support of student achievement trends and state education goals;

Provide for incentives to improve student achievement;

Provide for the establishment of a per pupil expenditure rate which shall also take into account the costs of programs for children with special needs and circumstances;

Establish a process to determine the rates in subdivision (5) of this subsection;

Provide for the design of an appropriate database; and

Include an implementation plan.

District contributions shall be based upon property values and income.

The department of administration shall provide recommendations for adjustments to the state and local tax structures to achieve the goals outlined in subdivisions (a)(1) through (8).

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall consult with various state and private parties which shall include but not be limited to the executive department, legislature, department of administration, league of cities and towns, school committees association, RIPEC, parent groups, teacher groups, and other interested organizations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 239, § 1.